Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-701
Act, how cited.

Sections 46-701 to 46-756 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 24;

Laws 1981, LB 146, § 12;

Laws 1982, LB 375, § 22;

Laws 1984, LB 1071, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 31;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 27;

R.S.Supp.,1994, § 46-674;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 619, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2003, § 46-656.01;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 41;

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB477, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB1098, § 13.